pl: Odmiana melona: Kanaryjski; Kantalupa; Charentais; Galia; Hami; Miodowy; Piel de Sapo (Santa Claus); Arbuz; Melon zimowy; Inne
fr: Variété de melon: Canari; Cantaloup; Charentais; Galia; Hami; Miel; Santa Claus (Piel de Sapo); Pastèque; Melon d’hiver; Autre
ro-RO: Soi de pepene: Canar; Cantalup; Charentais; Galia; Hami; Honeydew; Santa Claus (Piel de Sapo); Pepene roșu; Pepene de iarnă; Altele
sk-SK: Odroda melóna: Kanársky žltý; Kantalup; Charentais; Galia; Hami; Medový; Santa Claus (Piel de Sapo); Červený melón; Zimný melón; Iné
th: พันธุ์แตง: แคนารี; แคนตาลูป; ชาร็องแตร์; กาเลีย; ฮามิ; ฮันนี่ดิว; ซานตาคลอส (Piel de Sapo); แตงโม; ฟักเขียว; อื่นๆ
zh-CN: 甜瓜品种: 金丝雀甜瓜; 网纹甜瓜; 夏朗德甜瓜; 加利亚甜瓜; 哈密瓜; 蜜瓜; 圣诞老人瓜（蟾蜍皮甜瓜）; 西瓜; 冬瓜; 其他
pt-BR: Modalidade de melão: Amarelo; Cantaloupe; Charentais; Gália; Hami; Honeydew; Pele de Sapo; Melancia; Melão de inverno; Outro
sv: Melonsort: Kanariemelon; Cantaloupemelon; Charentaismelon; Galiamelon; Hamimelon; Honungsmelon; Santa Claus (Piel de sapo); Vattenmelon; Vintermelon; Annat
pt-PT: Variedade de melão: Canário; Cantalupo; Charentais; Gália; Hami; Honeydew; Santa Claus (Pele de sapo); Melancia; Melão de inverno; Outro
lt-LT: Melionų veislė: Kanarėlinis melionas; Kantalupa; Šarantinis melionas; „Galia“; „Hami“; Lipčinis melionas; Kalėdinis („Piel de Sapo“); Arbūzas; Žieminis melionas; Kita
es: Variedad de melón: Canario; Cantalupo; Charentais; Galia; Hami; Honeydew; Santa Claus (Piel de sapo); Sandía; Melón de invierno; Otro
it: Varietà di melone: Melone giallo; Cantalupo; Charentais; Galia; Hami; Melata; Piel de Sapo; Anguria; Melone d'inverno; Altro
cs: Odrůda melounu: Kanárský; Kantalup; Charentais; Galia; Hami; Medový; Santa Claus (Piel de Sapo); Vodní meloun; Zimní meloun; Jiné
fi: Melonilajike: Kanarianmeloni; Cantaloupemeloni; Charentaismeloni; Galiameloni; Hamimeloni; Hunajameloni; Joulumeloni (Piel de Sapo); Vesimeloni; Talvimeloni; Muu
ja: メロンの種類: カナリアメロン; カンタロープ; シャランテメロン; ガリアメロン; ハミ瓜; ハネジューメロン; サンタクロースメロン (ピエル・デ・サポ); スイカ; トウガン; その他
tr: Kavun çeşidi: Kanarya; Kantalup; Charentais; Galya; Hami; Kış kavunu; Piel de Sapo; Karpuz; Kış kavunu; Diğer
en: Melon variety: Canary; Cantaloupe; Charentais; Galia; Hami; Honeydew; Santa Claus (Piel de Sapo); Watermelon; Winter melon; Other
nl: Meloenvariëteit: Kanarie; Cantaloupe; Charentais; Galia; Hami; Honingmeloen; Santa Claus (Piel de Sapo); Watermeloen; Wintermeloen; Overige
sl-SI: Sorta melon: Kanarska melona; Kantalupa; Charentais melona; Galia; Hami melona; Medena melona; Božičkova melona (Piel de Sapo); Lubenica; Zimska melona; Drugo
hu: Sárgadinnye fajtája: Kanári dinnye; Kantalup dinnye; Charentais dinnye; Galia dinnye; Hami dinnye; Mézdinnye; Mikulásdinnye (Piel de Sapo); Görögdinnye; Téli dinnye; Egyéb
ru: Сорт дыни: Канария; Канталупа; Шаранте; Галия; Хами; Медовая; Санта-Клаус (Пиель де Сапо); Арбуз; Зимняя дыня; Другое
zh-TW: 瓜類品種: 黃香瓜 (Canary); 洋香瓜; 夏朗德香瓜 (Charentais); 加利亞哈密瓜 (Galia); 哈密瓜; 蜜瓜; 聖誕老人瓜 (Piel de Sapo); 西瓜; 冬瓜; 其他
de: Auswahl an Melonen: Kanarische Melone; Cantaloupe-Melone; Charentais-Melone; Galia-Melone; Hami-Melone; Honigmelone; Santa-Claus-Melone (Piel de Sapo); Wassermelone; Wintermelone; Sonstiges
nb: Melonvariant: Kanarimelon; Cantaloupemelon; Charentaismelon; Galiamelon; Hamimelon; Honningmelon; Froskeskinnsmelon (Piel de Sapo); Vannmelon; Vintermelon; Annet
bg-BG: Сорт пъпеш: Канари; Канталуп; Шаранте; Галия; Хами; Медена роса; Санта Клаус (Пиел де Сапо); Диня; Зимен пъпеш; Друго
da: Melonvariant: Kanarimelon; Cantaloupemelon; Charentaismelon; Galiamelon; Hamimelon; Honningmelon; Frøskindsmelon (Piel de Sapo); Vandmelon; Vintermelon; Andet
hr-HR: Sorta dinje: Kanarska; Cantaloupe; Charentais; Galia; Hami; Honeydew; Santa Claus (Piel de Sapo); Lubenica; Zimska dinja; Ostalo
ko: 멜론 품종: 카나리; 칸탈로프; 샤랑테; 갈리아; 하미; 허니듀; 산타클로스(피엘 데 사포); 수박; 동아; 기타
vi: Giống dưa: Dưa lê hoàng yến (Canary); Dưa lưới vàng (Cantaloupe); Dưa Charentais; Dưa Galia; Dưa vàng Hami; Dưa lê (Honeydew); Dưa ông già Noel (Piel de Sapo); Dưa hấu; Bí đao (Winter melon); Khác
el: Ποικιλία πεπονιού: Canary; Κανταλούπε; Charentais; Galia; Hami; Honeydew; Santa Claus (Piel de Sapo); Καρπούζι; Χειμωνιάτικο πεπόνι; Άλλο